Missouri, session 2026, HB2848.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 557.035, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 557.035 and 565.097, to read as follows:
557.035. 1. For all violations of section 565.054 or 565.090, subdivision (1) of
subsection 1 of section 569.100, or subdivision (1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7) or (8) of subsection 1
of section 571.030, which the state believes to be knowingly motivated because of race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation or disability of the victim or victims, the state
may charge the offense or offenses under this section, and the violation is a class D felony.
2. For all violations of section 565.056; subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section
569.090; section 565.097; subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 569.120; section
569.140; or section 574.050; which the state believes to be knowingly motivated because of
race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation or disability of the victim or
victims, the state may charge the offense or offenses under this section, and the violation is a
class E felony.
3. The court shall assess punishment in all of the cases in which the state pleads and
proves any of the motivating factors listed in this section.
565.097. 1. A person commits the offense of masked intimidation if the person
intentionally harasses, intimidates, or threatens any other person while hiding or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2848 2
concealing his or her face with a mask, hood, or any other article or device for the
purpose of concealing his or her identity and with the intent to place another person in
reasonable fear for his or her physical safety.
2. The offense of masked intimidation is a class C misdemeanor, unless it is a
second or subsequent offense of this section, in which case the offense is a class B
misdemeanor.
3. This section shall not apply to any person wearing a mask or otherwise
covering one's face for any purpose other than a purpose specified in subsection 1 of this
section, in cases where a person is wearing a:
(1) Mask or face covering on or near the occasion of a holiday, celebration, or
other event involving costumes;
(2) Mask, hood, article, or other device for the purpose of ensuring the physical
safety of the wearer or because of the nature of the person's occupation, trade, or
profession;
(3) Mask, hood, article, or other device for the purpose of protection from the
weather elements or while participating in a winter sport;
(4) Mask, hood, article, or other device in an artistic or theatrical production or
celebration;
(5) Gas mask or other protective facial covering for the purposes of protection
during or related to emergency situations or during emergency management drills;
(6) A mask for the purpose of ensuring one's physical health and safety or the
health and safety of others, including but not limited to limiting the spread of airborne
illnesses; or
(7) Any garb for religious purposes.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish or infringe upon any
right protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States.
5. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Harass", engaging in a knowing and willful pattern of conduct directed at a
particular person or particular group of persons that is intended to cause that person or
that group of persons to reasonably fear for their safety or suffer substantial emotional
distress;
(2) "Intimidate", willfully and substantially interfering, by threats, intimidation,
or coercion, with the exercise or enjoyment by any other person of rights secured by the
constitution or laws of the United States, or of rights secured by the constitution or laws
of this state, because of that person or person's actual or perceived race, color, religion,
national origin, ethnicity, sex, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation,
or disability;

HB 2848 3
(3) "Threaten", communication with the clear intention to cause imminent
physical injury to another person.
✔